New York, session 2025-2026, A2004.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 12 of section 66 of the public service law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (m) to read as follows: 3 (m) In any case in which the commission will be determining whether 4 any increased rate, fee, rental, or charge imposed by a utility will 5 occur, the commission shall, at least ninety days prior to the date when 6 such increase is to be decided on, hold a public hearing within the area 7 where such increase is proposed. Such public hearing shall include 8 public comments and allow for members of the public to ask questions of 9 the commission and the utility related to such increase. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 11 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 12 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 13 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 14 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01597-01-5